src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_HAPAN

:an  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
:an  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
:an  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
:an  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;

:pama  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
:pama  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
:pama  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_NONSTD  ;

:pame  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
:pame  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;

:pam  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
:pam  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
:pam  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:pam  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:pam  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;

!! ### -tOn suffixes
!!  The caritive suffix -ton inflects with A before the singular suffixes.

LEXICON NOUN_OSATON
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 34 ton
!!€  viaton: viaton+N+Sg+Nom # innocent
!!€  viattomana: viaton+N+Sg+Ess
0:on  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:toma  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tom  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:on  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:toma  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:tom  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:tom  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:on  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:tom  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:on  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:oma  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:tom  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
0:on  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_NIMETÖN
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 34 tän
!!€  nimetön: nimetön+N+Sg+Nom # unnamed
!!€  nimettömänä: nimetön+N+Sg+Ess
0:ön  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tömä  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:töm  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ön  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:tömä  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:töm  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:töm  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:ön  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:töm  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ön  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:öma  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:töm  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
0:ön  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;

!! ### Lexicalised superlatives
!!  The lexicalised superlatives have special inflection pattern.

LEXICON NOUN_VANHIN
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 35 back
!!€  kylänvanhin: kylänvanhin+N+Sg+Nom # elder
!!€  kylänvanhimpana: kylänvanhin+N+Sg+Ess
0:n  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:mpa  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:mma  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:mp  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:mm  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:n  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:mpa  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:mp  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:mp  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:n  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:mpa  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:mp  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:n  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:mma  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:mp  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
0:n  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;
0:mpa  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_LÄHIN
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 35 front
!!€  lähin: lähin+N+Sg+Nom # relative
!!€  lähimpänä: lähin+N+Sg+Ess
0:n  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:mpä  NOUN_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:mmä  NOUN_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:mp  NOUN_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:mm  NOUN_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:n  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:mpä  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:mp  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:mp  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:n  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:mpä  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:mp  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:n  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:mmä  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:mp  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
0:n  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;
0:mpä  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

!!  Vasen inflects almost like superlative:

LEXICON NOUN_VASEN
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 35
!!€  vasen: vasen+N+Sg+Nom # left
!!€  vasempana: vasen+N+Sg+Ess
0:n  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:mpa  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:mma  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:mp  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:mm  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:n  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:mpa  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:mpa  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:mp  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:mp  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:n  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:mpa  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:mp  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:n  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:mma  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:mp  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
0:n  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;
0:mpa  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

!! ### -nen suffixed forms
!!  Number of derivations end in -nen, that has special alternation pattern.

LEXICON NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 38 back
!!€  aakkostaminen: aakkostaminen+N+Sg+Nom # alphabetising
!!€  aakkostamisena: aakkostaminen+N+Sg+Ess
0:nen  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:se  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:s  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:s  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:se  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:s  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:s  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:s  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:s  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_S  ;
0:se  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:s  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
0:s  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 38 front
!!€  kylkiäinen: kylkiäinen+N+Sg+Nom # add-on
!!€  kylkiäisenä: kylkiäinen+N+Sg+Ess
0:nen  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:se  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:s  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:s  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:se  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:s  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:s  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:s  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:s  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_S  ;
0:se  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:s  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
0:s  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;

!! ### -s final words
!!  The s final words have some variation patterns that are determined
!!  lexically.

!!  The basic variation is s:ks, with e before the singular suffixes.
LEXICON NOUN_VAKUUTUS
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 39 back
!!€  vakuutus: vakuutus+N+Sg+Nom # insurance
!!€  vakuutuksena: vakuutus+N+Sg+Ess
0:s  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kse  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ks  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:s  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:kse  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:ks  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:ks  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:s  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:ks  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:s  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:kse  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ks  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
0:s  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_RÄJÄYTYS
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 39 front
!!€  räjäytys: räjäytys+N+Sg+Nom # explosion
!!€  räjäytyksenä: räjäytys+N+Sg+Ess
0:s  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kse  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ks  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:s  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:kse  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:ks  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:ks  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:s  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:ks  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:s  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:kse  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ks  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
0:s  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;

!!  Some of the s final stems have additional s:t:d variation in singular
!!  stems. Most notably, the UUs derivations are in this class.

LEXICON NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 40 back
!!€  aakkosellisuus: aakkosellisuus+N+Sg+Nom # alphabetificationness
!!€  aakkosellisuutena: aakkosellisuus+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  aakkosellisuudessa: aakkosellisuus+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  aakkosellisuuksina: aakkosellisuus+N+Pl+Ess
0:s  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:te  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:de  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ks  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:t  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:te  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:ks  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:ks  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ks  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:s  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:de  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ks  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_KÖYHYYS
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 40 front
!!€  köyhyys: köyhyys+N+Sg+Nom # poverty
!!€  köyhyytenä: köyhyys+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  köyhyydessä: köyhyys+N+Sg+Ine
0:s  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:te  NOUN_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:de  NOUN_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ks  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:t  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:te  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:ks  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:ks  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ks  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:s  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:de  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ks  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;

!!  Some s final words have special lengthening inflection.
