src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_Cmp
äreys+N:ärey  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
arvoisuus+N:arvoisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
asianosainen+N:asian#osai  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
asunnoton+N:asunno  NOUN_OSATON  ;
asuntohallitus+N:asunto#hallitu NOUN_VAKUUTUS ;
autoton+N:auto  NOUN_OSATON  ;
eleettömyys+N:eleettömyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
ensisijaisuus+N:ensisijaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
esi-ihminen+N:esi-#ihmi NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN ;
esiintymistiheys+N:esiintymis#tihey  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
esinäytös+N:esi#näytö  NOUN_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
fenomenologinen+N:fenomenologi  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
fraseeraus+N:fraseerau  NOUN_VAKUUTUS  ;
hampaaton+N:hampaat  NOUN_OSATON  ;
hapan+N:hap  NOUN_HAPAN  ;
hölmöys+N:hölmöy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
huippunopeus+N:huippunopeu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
huomauttaminen+N:huomauttami  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
hylkiminen+N:hylkimi  NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
ilmajäähdytys+N:ilma#jäähdyty  NOUN_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
järkyttävyys+N:järkyttävyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
jätteidentutkimus+N:jätteiden#tutkimu  NOUN_VAKUUTUS  ;
juvalainen+N:juvalai  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
kääpiöohrakärpänen+N:kääpiöohrakärpä  NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
kaikkeinpyhin+N:kaikkeinpyhi  NOUN_LÄHIN  ;
kaikkeinpyhin+N:kaikkeinpyhi  NOUN_LÄHIN  ;
kastiton+N:kastit  NOUN_OSATON  ;
katarttinen+N:katartti  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
kaunokirjallisuus+N:kauno#kirjallisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
kertarysäys+N:kertarysäy  NOUN_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
kiertelemättömyys+N:kiertelemättömyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
kiristäminen+N:kiristämi  NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
kirskaus+N:kirskau  NOUN_VAKUUTUS  ;
koeaamiainen+N:koe#aamiai  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
kylänvanhin+N:kylän#vanhi  NOUN_VANHIN  ;
kyselevyys+N:kyselevyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
lähin+N:lähi  NOUN_LÄHIN  ;
lähitulevaisuus+N:lähi#tulevaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
läikähdys+N:läikähdy  NOUN_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
lainsuojaton+N:lain#suoja  NOUN_OSATON  ;
laiton+N:lait  NOUN_OSATON  ;
lämpeneminen+N:lämpenemi  NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
lautalaskos+N:lautalasko  NOUN_VAKUUTUS  ;
lemlandilainen+N:lemlandilai  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
lyöntitiheys+N:lyöntitihey  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
mahdoton+N:mahdo  NOUN_OSATON  ;
mäntypistiäinen+N:mäntypistiäi  NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
marttayhdistys+N:marttayhdisty  NOUN_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
metsäkaartilaisuus+N:metsäkaartilaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
moottorijarrutus+N:moottori#jarrutu  NOUN_VAKUUTUS  ;
nastolalainen+N:nastolalai  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
nesteenpitävyys+N:nesteen#pitävyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
nimetön+N:nime  NOUN_NIMETÖN  ;
nimetön+N:nimet  NOUN_NIMETÖN  ;
nykyihminen+N:nyky#ihmi  NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
olkaimeton+N:olkaimet  NOUN_OSATON  ;
ovenkynnys+N:oven#kynny NOUN_RÄJÄYTYS ;
päätösvaltaisuus+N:päätösvaltaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
parannusehdotus+N:parannusehdotu  NOUN_VAKUUTUS  ;
piilotyötön+N:piilo#työ  NOUN_NIMETÖN  ;
piilotyötön+N:piilotyö  NOUN_NIMETÖN  ;
piilotyötön+N:piilo#työt  NOUN_NIMETÖN  ;
pitkäaikaistyötön+N:pitkä#aikais#työ  NOUN_NIMETÖN  ;
pitkäaikaistyötön+N:pitkäaikaistyö  NOUN_NIMETÖN  ;
pitkäaikaistyötön+N:pitkä#aikais#työt  NOUN_NIMETÖN  ;
pohjoiskoillinen+N:pohjois#koilli  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
pöllönen+N:pöllö  NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
postiennakkolähetys+N:posti#ennakko#lähety  NOUN_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
puolueeton+N:puoluee  NOUN_OSATON  ;
rantakasvillisuus+N:ranta#kasvillisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
raukkis+N:raukki  NOUN_VAKUUTUS  ;
rippikoulunkäymätön+N:rippi#koulunkäymä  NOUN_NIMETÖN  ;
rippikoulunkäymätön+N:rippikoulunkäymä  NOUN_NIMETÖN  ;
rippikoulunkäymätön+N:rippi#koulunkäymät  NOUN_NIMETÖN  ;
ristiäinen+N:ristiäi  NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
rypytys+N:rypyty  NOUN_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
säilyvyys+N:säilyvyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
satakuntalainen+N:sata#kunta#lai  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
selkärangaton+N:selkärangat  NOUN_OSATON  ;
sisin+N:sisi  NOUN_LÄHIN  ;
sisin+N:sisi  NOUN_LÄHIN  ;
sopeutumislevittäytyminen+N:sopeutumislevittäytymi  NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
sopimuskierros+N:sopimus#kierro  NOUN_VAKUUTUS  ;
sukuoikeus+N:suku#oikeu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
sydämenpysähdys+N:sydämen#pysähdy  NOUN_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
tennisammattilainen+N:tennisammattilai  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
tinkimättömyys+N:tinkimättömyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
tosikertomus+N:tosikertomu  NOUN_VAKUUTUS  ;
tuholaisuus+N:tuholaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
tykitys+N:tykity  NOUN_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
uskonnoton+N:uskonnot  NOUN_OSATON  ;
värähdyslaajuus+N:värähdyslaajuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
vasen+N:vase  NOUN_VASEN  ;
velkasaneeraus+N:velka#saneerau  NOUN_VAKUUTUS  ;
venttiilinlautanen+N:venttiilin#lauta  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
veronlisäys+N:veronlisäy  NOUN_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
vetäytyminen+N:vetäytymi  NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
yhteistyökykyisyys+N:yhteistyö#kykyisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
yläosaton+N:yläosa  NOUN_OSATON  ;
